Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202667-293
Filing fees; disposition.

The filing fee for all filings pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Limited Partnership Act, including amendments and name reservation, shall be thirty dollars if the filing is submitted in writing and twenty-five dollars if the filing is submitted electronically pursuant to section 84-511, except that the filing fee for filing a certificate of limited partnership pursuant to section 67-240 and for filing an application for registration as a foreign limited partnership pursuant to section 67-281 shall be one hundred ten dollars if the filing is submitted in writing and one hundred dollars if the filing is submitted electronically pursuant to section 84-511. A fee of one dollar per page shall be paid for a certified copy of any document on file pursuant to the act. The fees for filings pursuant to the act shall be paid to the Secretary of State and by him or her remitted to the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit sixty percent of such fees to the General Fund and forty percent of such fees to the Secretary of State Cash Fund.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 61;

Laws 1983, LB 617, § 12;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 60;

Laws 1990, LB 1228, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 1004, § 6;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 59;

Laws 2003, LB 357, § 10;

Laws 2020, LB910, § 27.